West Virginia, session 2026, HB4292.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64- 9 - 1. Board of Medicine. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 25, 2025, authorized under the authority of §30-3E-3 of this code, relating to the Board of Medicine (licensure, practice requirements, disciplinary and complaint procedures, continuing education, physician assistants, 11 CSR 01B), is authorized.